Hawaii statutes.
§490:9-614 Contents and form of
notification before disposition of collateral: consumer-goods transaction.
In a consumer-goods transaction, the following rules apply:

(1) A notification of disposition must provide the
following information:

(A) The information specified in section
490:9-613(1);

(B) A description of any liability for a
deficiency of the person to which the notification is sent;

(C) A telephone number from which the amount
that must be paid to the secured party to redeem the collateral under section
490:9-623 is available; and

(D) A telephone number or mailing address from
which additional information concerning the disposition and the obligation
secured is available.

(2) A particular phrasing of the notification is not
required.

(3) The following form of notification, when
completed, provides sufficient information:

[Name and
address of secured party]

[Date]

NOTICE OF
OUR PLAN TO SELL PROPERTY

[Name
and address of any obligor who is also a debtor]

Subject: [Identification
of Transaction]

We
have your [describe collateral] ,
because you broke promises in our agreement.

[For a public disposition:]

We
will sell [describe collateral]
at public sale sometime after [date] .
A sale could include a lease or license.

The sale will be held as follows:

Day
and Date: _______________________________

Time: _______________________________

Place: _______________________________

You
may attend the sale and bring bidders if you want.

[For
a private disposition:]

We
will sell [describe collateral]
at private sale sometime after [date] .
A sale could include a lease or license.

The
money that we get from the sale (after paying our costs) will reduce the amount
you owe. If we get less money than you owe, you [will
or will not, as applicable] still owe us the
difference. If we get more money than you owe, you will get the extra money,
unless we must pay it to someone else.

You
can get the property back at any time before we sell it by paying us the full
amount you owe (not just the past due payments), including our expenses. To
learn the exact amount you must pay, call us at [telephone
number] .

If
you want us to explain to you in writing how we have figured the amount that
you owe us, you may call us at [telephone
number] [or write us at [secured
party's address] ] and request a written
explanation. [We will charge you $
for the explanation if we sent you another written explanation of the amount
you owe us within the last six months.]

If
you need more information about the sale call us at [telephone
number] [or write us at [secured
party's address] ].

We
are sending this notice to the following other people who have an interest in [describe
collateral] or who owe money under your
agreement:

[Names
of all other debtors and obligors, if any] .

(4) A notification in the form of paragraph (3) is
sufficient, even if additional information appears at the end of the form.

(5) A notification in the form of paragraph (3) is
sufficient, even if it includes errors in information not required by paragraph
(1), unless the error is misleading with respect to rights arising under this
article.

(6) If a notification under this section is not in
the form of paragraph (3), law other than this article determines the effect of
including information not required by paragraph (1). [L 2000, c 241, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next